Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 23.3 Nontransparent Windshields and Windows

31-23.3-1.
Definitions.

The following words and phrases, for the purposes of this chapter only, have the following meanings:

“Motor vehicle” means any vehicle, except those vehicles defined in §

31-1-8

as vehicles used in farm husbandry, which is registered or required to be registered in the state.

“Multipurpose passenger vehicle” means a motor vehicle with motive power designed to carry ten (10) persons or fewer which is constructed either on a truck chassis or with special features for occasional off-road operation.

“Reflectance” means the ratio of the amount of total light, expressed in a percentage, which is reflected outward by the product or material to the amount of total light falling on the product or material.

“Sunscreening material” means a product or material, including film, glazing, and perforated sunscreening, which, when applied to the windshield or windows of a motor vehicle, reduces the effects of the sun with respect to light reflectance or transmittance.

“Transmittance” means the ratio of the amount of total light, expressed in a percentage, which is allowed to pass through the product or material, including glazing, to the amount of total light falling on the product or material and the glazing.

“Window” means any device designed for exterior viewing from a motor vehicle, except the windshield, any roof-mounted viewing device, and any viewing device having less than one hundred fifty (150) square inches in area.

“Windshield” means the front exterior viewing device of a motor vehicle.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 250, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 408, § 1.

31-23.3-2.
Windshields and windows obscured by nontransparent materials.

No person shall own and operate any motor vehicle upon any public highway, road or street with nontransparent or sunscreen material, window application, reflective film or non-reflective film used in any way to cover or treat the front windshield, the side windows immediately adjacent to the right and left of the operator’s seat, the side windows immediately to the rear of the operator’s seat and the front passenger seat and the rear window unless this vehicle meets one of the criteria set forth in §

31-23.3-3

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 250, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 408, § 1.

31-23.3-3.
Rules and regulations authorized — Administrator of the division of motor vehicles.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall establish rules and regulations to provide standards and tests to measure the percentage of reflective and transmittance of light.

Any person, firm, corporation, or other entity installing such a sunscreen device on a motor vehicle shall provide and affix a label to the front window not to exceed one and one-half (11/2) square inches in size, which contains the installer’s name and the percentage of light transmittance. Facing the motor vehicle from the outside, the label shall be placed in the lower left corner of the front window.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 250, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 408, § 1.

31-23.3-4.
Exemptions.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to:

Motor vehicles manufactured with windshields and window glass areas equipped in accordance with specifications of 49 CFR 571.205 as authorized by 15 U.S.C. § 1407.

Motor vehicles owned or leased by federal, state and local law enforcement agencies.

The use of nontransparent or sunscreen material or window application on motor vehicles which has a total visible light transmittance of not less than seventy percent (70%) measured perpendicular to the surface of the glass on the windshield and side windows immediately adjacent to the right and left of the operator’s seat, the side windows immediately to the rear of the operator’s seat and the front passenger seat or on the rear window if the vehicle is equipped with two (2) outside mirrors, one on each side, adjusted so that the driver has a clear view of the highway behind the vehicle.

The use of any transparent material limited to the uppermost six inches (6") along the top of the windshield, provided the strip does not encroach upon the driver’s direct forward viewing area as more particularly described and defined in applicable Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standards.

Motor vehicles not required to be registered in this state.

The use of sunscreen material on windows behind the driver in trucks, buses, trailers, mobile homes, campers, multipurpose vehicles, charter buses, funeral service vehicles, or limousines, provided that the vehicle is equipped with two (2) outside mirrors, one on each side, if those mirrors meet federal standards adjusted so the driver has a clear view of the highway behind the vehicle.

A motor vehicle registered in this state in the name of a person, or the person’s legal guardian, who has an affidavit signed by a physician or an optometrist licensed to practice in this state that states that the person has a physical condition that makes it necessary to equip the motor vehicle with a sunscreening device which may exceed federal standards. The division of motor vehicles, upon application of the individual, which shall include the affidavit, shall issue a sticker to be applied to the driver’s side window to identify this exemption.

Any motor vehicle, registered and garaged within this state, whose sole purpose is to provide executive security to persons within this state. The owner(s) of the vehicle shall first seek and obtain written permission from the local police chief where the vehicle is garaged and registered before the waiver is granted.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 250, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 408, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 76, § 1.

31-23.3-5.
Penalties.

Any person, firm, corporation, or other business entity that installs any sunscreening material which is not in compliance with the provisions of this chapter shall be fined not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each offense.

Any person who owns a motor vehicle which has installed on it any sunscreening device or material in violation of this chapter shall be fined not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 250, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 408, § 1.

31-23.3-6.
Vehicles with existing sunscreening materials.

The owners of all motor vehicles who have sunscreening material in their motor vehicle in violation of the provisions of this chapter may be found in violation of the provisions of this chapter; provided, an owner of a motor vehicle shall not be required to remove any sunscreening material if that material was initially installed by the motor vehicle manufacturer and was purchased prior to December 1, 1993.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 250, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 408, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 73.